Arkansas, session 2025, HB1730.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 3-4-609 is amended to read as follows:
3-4-609. Wholesaler permit — Issuance — Transfer.
(a)(1)(a) A new wholesaler permit shall not be issued under § 3-4-605
or § 3-4-607 on or after September 1, 2013 may be issued on or after July 1,
2026.
(b) A new minimum wholesaler permit under § 3-4-607 may be issued on
or after the effective date of this act.
(2) However, a holder of a wholesaler permit under § 3-4-605 or
§ 3-4-607 issued on or before September 1, 2013, may renew the permit before,
on, or after September 1, 2013.
(b) A holder of a wholesaler permit issued under § 3-4-605 or § 3-4-
607 on or before September 1, 2013, may transfer the wholesaler permit to
another wholesaler as permitted under applicable law or regulation of the
Alcoholic Beverage Control Division.
/s/M. Brown

*CRH190*
04-02-2025 10:34:11 CRH190